Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0439.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 6t. (1) The commission shall, by August 31, 2025, and every 4 years thereafter, commence a proceeding and, in consultation with the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy, and other interested parties, do all of the following as part of the proceeding: (a) Conduct an assessment of the potential for energy waste reduction in this state. (b) Conduct an assessment for the use of demand response programs in this state, based on what is economically and technologically feasible, as well as what is reasonably achievable. The assessment must expressly account for advanced metering infrastructure that has already been installed in this state and seek to fully maximize potential benefits to ratepayers in lowering utility bills. (c) Identify significant state or federal environmental regulations, laws, or rules and how each regulation, law, or rule would affect electric utilities in this state. (d) Identify any formally proposed state or federal environmental regulation, law, or rule that has been published in the Michigan Register or the Federal Register and how the proposed regulation, law, or rule would affect electric utilities in this state. (e) Identify any required planning reserve margins and local clearing requirements in areas of this state. (f) Establish the modeling scenarios and assumptions each electric utility should include in addition to its own scenarios and assumptions in developing its integrated resource plan filed under subsection (3), including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Any required planning reserve margins and local clearing requirements. (ii) All applicable state and federal environmental regulations, laws, and rules identified in this subsection. (iii) Any supply-side and demand-side resources that reasonably could address any need for additional generation capacity, including, but not limited to, the type of generation technology for any proposed generation facility, projected energy waste reduction savings, projected load impact due to electrification, and projected load management and demand response savings. (iv) Any regional infrastructure limitations in this state. (v) The projected costs of different types of technologies and fuel used for electric generation. (g) Allow other state agencies to provide input regarding any other regulatory requirements that should be included in modeling scenarios or assumptions. (h) Publish a copy of the proposed modeling scenarios and assumptions to be used in integrated resource plans on the commission's website. (i) Before issuing the final modeling scenarios and assumptions each electric utility should include in developing its integrated resource plan, receive written comments and hold hearings to solicit public input regarding the proposed modeling scenarios and assumptions. (j) Conduct an assessment of the potential for electrification of transportation, buildings, and industries consistent with economy-wide elimination of greenhouse gas emissions in this state, based on what is economically and technically feasible, as well as what is reasonably achievable. (k) Identify environmental justice communities. (2) A proceeding commenced under subsection (1) must be completed within 120 days, and is not a contested case under chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. The determination of the modeling assumptions for integrated resource plans made under subsection (1) is not considered a final order for purposes of judicial review. The determinations made under subsection (1) are only subject to judicial review as part of the final commission order approving an integrated resource plan under this section. (3) Not later than April 20, 2019, each electric utility whose rates are regulated by the commission shall file with the commission an integrated resource plan that provides a 5-year, 10-year, and 15-year projection of the utility's load obligations and a plan to meet those obligations, to meet the utility's requirements to provide generation reliability, including meeting planning reserve margin and local clearing requirements determined by the commission or the appropriate independent system operator, and to meet all applicable state and federal reliability and environmental regulations over the ensuing term of the plan. The commission shall issue an order establishing filing requirements, including application forms and instructions, and filing deadlines for an integrated resource plan filed by an electric utility whose rates are regulated by the commission. The electric utility's plan may include alternative modeling scenarios and assumptions in addition to those identified under subsection (1). (4) For an electric utility with fewer than 1,000,000 customers in this state whose rates are regulated by the commission, the commission may issue an order implementing separate filing requirements, review criteria, and approval standards that differ from those established under subsection (3). An electric utility providing electric tariff service to customers both in this state and in at least 1 other state may design its integrated resource plan to cover all its customers on that multistate basis. If an electric utility has filed a multistate integrated resource plan that includes its service area in this state with the relevant utility regulatory commission in another state in which it provides tariff service to retail customers, the commission shall accept that integrated resource plan filing for filing purposes in this state. However, the commission may require supplemental information if necessary as part of its evaluation and determination of whether to approve the plan. Upon request of an electric utility, the commission may adjust the filing dates for a multistate integrated resource plan filing in this state to place its review on the same timeline as other relevant state reviews. (5) An integrated resource plan must include all of the following: (a) A long-term forecast of the electric utility's sales and peak demand under various reasonable scenarios. (b) The type of generation technology proposed for a generation facility contained in the plan and the proposed capacity of the generation facility, including projected fuel costs under various reasonable scenarios. (c) Projected energy purchased or produced by the electric utility from a renewable energy resource. If the level of renewable energy purchased or produced is projected to drop over the planning periods set forth in subsection (3), the electric utility must demonstrate why the reduction is in the best interest of ratepayers. (d) An analysis of how the electric utility's plan complies with the renewable energy plan requirements and goals of section 28 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1028, the clean energy requirements of section 51 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1051, the energy waste reduction measures in section 77 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1077, and the energy storage target of section 101 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1101. (e) Projected load management and demand response savings for the electric utility and the projected costs for those programs. (f) Projected energy and capacity purchased or produced by the electric utility from a cogeneration resource. (g) An analysis of potential new or upgraded electric transmission options for the electric utility. (h) Data regarding the utility's current generation portfolio, including the age, capacity factor, licensing status, and remaining estimated time of operation for each facility in the portfolio. (i) Plans for meeting current and future capacity needs with the cost estimates for all proposed construction and major investments, including any transmission or distribution infrastructure that would be required to support the proposed construction or investment, and power purchase agreements. (j) An analysis of the cost, capacity factor, and viability of all reasonable options available to meet projected energy and capacity needs, including, but not limited to, existing electric generation facilities in this state. (k) Projected rate and affordability impact for the periods covered by the plan. (l) How the utility will comply with all applicable state and federal environmental regulations, laws, and rules, and the projected costs of complying with those regulations, laws, and rules. (m) A forecast of the utility's peak demand and details regarding the amount of peak demand reduction the utility expects to achieve and the actions the utility proposes to take in order to achieve that peak demand reduction. (n) The projected long-term firm gas transportation contracts or natural gas storage the electric utility will hold to provide an adequate supply of natural gas to any new generation facility. (o) The projected long-term forecast of greenhouse gas emissions and other pollutants from power generated or purchased by the electric utility. The electric utility may include details on the broader emissions impact of shifting to electrification of transportation, buildings, and industries. (p) An environmental justice impact analysis that includes a review of the reasonably anticipated environmental justice impacts for any plan that includes the construction of a new natural-gas-fired generation facility and an analysis of whether the facility complies with the requirements for clean energy systems established in the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1001 to 460.1211. If a plan proposes retiring or retaining 1 or more fossil fuel peaking plants, in an environmental justice community, a review of the reasonably anticipated environmental justice impacts for each generation facility. (6) Before filing an integrated resource plan under this section, each electric utility whose rates are regulated by the commission shall issue a request for proposals to provide any new supply-side generation capacity resources needed to serve the utility's reasonably projected electric load, applicable planning reserve margin, and local clearing requirement for its customers in this state and customers the utility serves in other states during the initial 3-year planning period to be considered in each integrated resource plan to be filed under this section. An electric utility shall define qualifying performance standards, contract terms, technical competence, capability, reliability, creditworthiness, past performance, and other criteria that responses and respondents to the request for proposals must meet in order to be considered by the utility in its integrated resource plan to be filed under this section. Respondents to a request for proposals may request that certain proprietary information be exempt from public disclosure as allowed by the commission. A utility that issues a request for proposals under this subsection shall use the resulting proposals to inform its integrated resource plan filed under this section and include all of the submitted proposals as attachments to its integrated resource plan filing regardless of whether the proposals met the qualifying performance standards, contract terms, technical competence, capability, reliability, creditworthiness, past performance, or other criteria specified for the utility's request for proposals under this section. An existing supplier of electric generation capacity currently producing at least 200 megawatts of firm electric generation capacity resources located in the independent system operator's zone in which the utility's load is served that seeks to provide electric generation capacity resources to the utility may submit a written proposal directly to the commission as an alternative to any supply-side generation capacity resource included in the electric utility's integrated resource plan submitted under this section, and has standing to intervene in the contested case proceeding conducted under this section. This subsection does not require an entity that submits an alternative under this subsection to submit an integrated resource plan. This subsection does not limit the ability of any other person to submit to the commission an alternative proposal to any supply-side generation capacity resource included in the electric utility's integrated resource plan submitted under this section and to petition for and be granted leave to intervene in the contested case proceeding conducted under this section under the rules of practice and procedure of the commission. The commission shall only consider an alternative proposal submitted under this subsection as part of its approval process under subsection (8). The electric utility submitting an integrated resource plan under this section is not required to adopt any proposals submitted under this subsection. To the extent practicable, each electric utility is encouraged, but not required, to partner with other electric providers in the same local resource zone as the utility's load is served in the development of any new supply-side generation capacity resources included as part of its integrated resource plan. (7) Not later than 300 days after an electric utility files an integrated resource plan under this section, the commission shall state if the commission has any recommended changes, and if so, describe them in sufficient detail to allow their incorporation in the integrated resource plan. If the commission does not recommend changes, it shall issue a final, appealable order approving or denying the plan filed by the electric utility. If the commission recommends changes, the commission shall set a schedule allowing parties at least 15 days after that recommendation to file comments regarding those recommendations, and allowing the electric utility at least 30 days to consider the recommended changes and submit a revised integrated resource plan that incorporates 1 or more of the recommended changes. If the electric utility submits a revised integrated resource plan under this section, the commission shall issue a final, appealable order approving the plan as revised by the electric utility or denying the plan. The commission shall issue a final, appealable order no later than 360 days after an electric utility files an integrated resource plan under this section. Up to 150 days after an electric utility makes its initial filing, the electric utility may file to update its cost estimates if those cost estimates have materially changed. A utility shall not modify any other aspect of the initial filing unless the utility withdraws and refiles the application. A utility's filing updating its cost estimates does not extend the period for the commission to issue an order approving or denying the integrated resource plan. The following are applicable to an integrated resource plan filed under this section: (a) The commission shall do all of the following: (i) Review the integrated resource plan in a contested case proceeding conducted in accordance with chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. (ii) Allow intervention by interested persons including electric customers of the utility, respondents to the utility's request for proposals under this section, or other parties approved by the commission. (iii) Request an advisory opinion from the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy regarding all of the following: (A) Whether any potential decrease in emissions of sulfur dioxide, oxides of nitrogen, mercury, and particulate matter would reasonably be expected to result if the integrated resource plan proposed by the electric utility under subsection (3) was approved. (B) Whether the integrated resource plan can reasonably be expected to achieve compliance with the regulations, laws, or rules identified in subsection (1). (C) The potential impacts of proposed energy generation resources and of any prudent and feasible alternatives identified by the department on whether the plan makes adequate progress toward achieving the clean energy standard established in section 51 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1051. (D) The potential impacts of the plan and of any prudent and feasible alternatives identified by the department on whether the plan makes adequate progress toward the economy-wide virtual elimination of greenhouse gas emissions in this state by 2050. (E) Whether the plan in comparison to any prudent and feasible alternatives makes adequate progress toward the elimination of adverse effects on human health due to power generation in this state. (F) Whether the plan in comparison to any prudent and feasible alternatives adequately reduces harms to the health, safety, and welfare of individuals in environmental justice communities. (b) The commission may do 1 or both of the following: (i) Take official notice of the opinion issued by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy under this subsection pursuant to R 792.10428 of the Michigan Administrative Code. Information submitted by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy under this subsection is advisory and is not binding on future determinations by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy or the commission in any proceeding or permitting process. This section does not prevent an electric utility from applying for, or receiving, any necessary permits from the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (ii) Invite other state agencies to provide testimony regarding other relevant regulatory requirements related to the integrated resource plan. The commission shall permit reasonable discovery after an integrated resource plan is filed and during the hearing in order to assist parties and interested persons in obtaining evidence concerning the integrated resource plan, including, but not limited to, the reasonableness and prudence of the plan and alternatives to the plan raised by intervening parties. (8) The commission shall approve the integrated resource plan under subsection (7) if the commission determines all of the following: (a) The proposed integrated resource plan represents the most reasonable and prudent means of meeting the electric utility's energy and capacity needs. To determine whether the integrated resource plan is the most reasonable and prudent means of meeting energy and capacity needs, the commission shall consider whether the plan appropriately balances all of the following factors: (i) Resource adequacy and capacity to serve anticipated peak electric load, applicable planning reserve margin, and local clearing requirement. (ii) Compliance with applicable state and federal environmental regulations. (iii) Competitive pricing. (iv) Reliability. (v) Commodity price risks. (vi) Diversity of generation supply. (vii) Whether the proposed levels of peak load reduction and energy waste reduction are reasonable and cost-effective. (viii) Affordability. (ix) Overall cost-effectiveness in providing utility service. (b) To the extent practicable, the construction or investment in a new or existing capacity resource in this state is completed using a workforce composed of residents of this state as determined by the commission. This subdivision does not apply to a capacity resource that is located in a county that lies on the border with another state. (c) The construction and construction maintenance of new or the rehabilitation of existing capacity resources in this state includes using an apprenticeship program registered and certified with the United States Secretary of Labor under the national apprenticeship act, 29 USC 50 to 50c, and the workers employed for the construction or construction maintenance of the energy facility are paid a minimum wage standard not less than the wage and fringe benefit rates prevailing in the locality in which the work is to be performed as determined under 2023 PA 10, MCL 408.1101 to 408.1126, or 40 USC 3141 to 3148, whichever provides the higher wage and fringe benefit rates, and, to the extent permitted by law, the entities performing the construction or construction maintenance work shall enter into a project labor agreement or operate under a collective bargaining agreement for the work to be performed. This subdivision does not apply to an independent power producer supplying power under a contract or agreement entered into in accordance with the public utility regulatory policies act of 1978, Public Law 95-617, as of the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subdivision. As used in this subdivision, "project labor agreement" means a prehire collective bargaining agreement with 1 or more labor organizations that establishes the terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project and does all of the following: (i) Binds all contractors and subcontractors on the construction project through the inclusion of appropriate specifications in all relevant solicitation provisions and contract documents. (ii) Allows all contractors and subcontractors on the construction project to compete for contracts and subcontracts without regard to whether they are otherwise parties to collective bargaining agreements. (iii) Contains guarantees against strikes, lockouts, and similar job disruptions. (iv) Sets forth effective, prompt, and mutually binding procedures for resolving labor disputes arising during the term of the project labor agreement. (v) Provides other mechanisms for labor-management cooperation on matters of mutual interest and concern, including productivity, quality of work, safety, and health. (vi) Complies with all state and federal laws, rules, and regulations. (d) The plan is consistent with the renewable energy plan requirements and goals of section 28 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1028, the clean energy requirements of section 51 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1051, the energy waste reduction measures in section 77 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1077, and the energy storage target of section 101 of the clean and renewable energy and energy waste reduction act, 2008 PA 295, MCL 460.1101. (e) The plan promotes environmental quality and public health and reasonably mitigates adverse effects on human health due to power generation, with a priority on mitigating impacts and prioritizing benefits to communities disproportionately impacted by pollution and other environmental harms. (f) The plan meets the requirements of subsection (5). (9) If the commission denies a utility's integrated resource plan, the utility, within 60 days after the date of the final order denying the integrated resource plan, may submit revisions to the integrated resource plan to the commission for approval. The commission shall commence a new contested case hearing under chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.288. Not later than 90 days after the date that the utility submits the revised integrated resource plan to the commission under this subsection, the commission shall issue an order approving or denying, with recommendations, the revised integrated resource plan if the revisions are not substantial or inconsistent with the original integrated resource plan filed under this section. If the revisions are substantial or inconsistent with the original integrated resource plan, the commission has up to 150 days to issue an order approving or denying, with recommendations, the revised integrated resource plan. (10) If the commission denies an electric utility's integrated resource plan, the electric utility may proceed with a proposed construction, purchase, investment, or power purchase agreement contained in the integrated resource plan without the assurances granted under this section. (11) In approving an integrated resource plan under this section, the commission shall specify the costs approved for the construction of or significant investment in an electric generation or energy storage facility, the purchase of an existing electric generation or energy storage facility, the purchase of power under the terms of the power purchase or energy storage agreement, or other investments or resources used to meet energy and capacity needs that are included in the approved integrated resource plan. The costs for specifically identified investments, including the costs for facilities under subsection (12), included in an approved integrated resource plan that are commenced within 3 years after the commission's order approving the initial plan, amended plan, or plan review are considered reasonable and prudent for cost recovery purposes. (12) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (13), for a new electric generation or energy storage facility approved in an integrated resource plan that is to be owned by the electric utility and that is commenced within 3 years after the commission's order approving the plan, the commission shall finalize the approved costs for the electric generation or energy storage facility only after the utility has done all of the following and filed the results, analysis, and recommendations with the commission: (a) Implemented a competitive bidding process for all major engineering, procurement, and construction contracts associated with the construction of the electric generation or energy storage facility. (b) Implemented a competitive bidding process that allows third parties to submit firm and binding bids for the construction of an electric generation or energy storage facility on behalf of the utility that would meet all of the technical, commercial, and other specifications required by the utility for the generation or energy storage facility, such that ownership of the electric generation or energy storage facility vests with the utility no later than the date the electric generation or energy storage facility becomes commercially available. (c) Demonstrated to the commission that the finalized costs for the new electric generation or energy storage facility are not significantly higher than the initially approved costs under subsection (11). If the finalized costs are found to be significantly higher than the initially approved costs, the commission shall review and approve the proposed costs if the commission determines those costs are reasonable and prudent. (13) If the capacity resource under subsection (12) is for the construction of an electric generation facility of 225 megawatts or more or for the construction of an additional generating unit or units totaling 225 megawatts or more at an existing electric generation facility, the utility shall submit an application to the commission seeking a certificate of necessity under section 6s. (14) An electric utility shall annually, or more frequently if required by the commission, file reports to the commission regarding the status of any projects included in the initial 3-year period of an integrated resource plan approved under subsection (7). (15) If an electric provider whose rates are regulated by the commission enters into a purchase power agreement for renewable energy resources or a third-party contract for energy storage systems or clean energy systems with an entity that is not affiliated with that utility, the commission shall authorize a financial incentive for that utility calculated as the product of contract payments in that year multiplied by the electric provider's pretax weighted average cost of permanent capital comprised of long-term debt obligations and equity of the electric provider's total capital structure as determined by the commission's final order in the electric provider's most recent general rate case. The pretax weighted average cost of permanent capital used to calculate the financial incentive must not be fixed throughout the entire term of the contract at the pretax weighted average cost of capital applicable in the first year and must be updated based on the commission's final order in each succeeding general rate case for the electric provider. The financial incentive applies to each contract described in this subsection from the date the contract is executed for the entire term of the contract. This subsection applies to any contract entered into after June 30, 2024. (16) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an order by the commission approving an integrated resource plan may be reviewed by the court of appeals upon a filing by a party to the commission proceeding within 30 days after the order is issued. All appeals of the order must be heard and determined as expeditiously as possible with lawful precedence over other matters. Review on appeal is based solely on the record before the commission and briefs to the court and is limited to whether the order conforms to the constitution and laws of this state and the United States and is within the authority of the commission under this act. (17) The commission shall include in an electric utility's retail rates all reasonable and prudent costs specified under subsections (11) and (12) that have been incurred to implement an integrated resource plan approved by the commission. The commission shall not disallow recovery of costs an electric utility incurs in implementing an approved integrated resource plan, if the costs do not exceed the costs approved by the commission under subsections (11) and (12). If the actual costs incurred by the electric utility exceed the costs approved by the commission, the electric utility has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the costs are reasonable and prudent. The portion of the cost of a plant, facility, power purchase agreement, or other investment in a resource that meets a demonstrated need for capacity that exceeds the cost approved by the commission is presumed to have been incurred due to a lack of prudence. The commission may include any or all of the portion of the cost in excess of the cost approved by the commission if the commission finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the costs are reasonable and prudent. The commission shall disallow costs the commission finds have been incurred as the result of fraud, concealment, gross mismanagement, or lack of quality controls amounting to gross mismanagement. The commission shall also require refunds with interest to ratepayers of any of these costs already recovered through the electric utility's rates and charges. If the assumptions underlying an approved integrated resource plan materially change, or if the commission believes it is unlikely that a project or program will become commercially operational, an electric utility may request, or the commission on its own motion may initiate, a proceeding to review whether it is reasonable and prudent to complete an unfinished project or program included in an approved integrated resource plan. If the commission finds that completion of the project or program is no longer reasonable and prudent, the commission may modify or cancel approval of the project or program and unincurred costs in the electric utility's integrated resource plan. Except for costs the commission finds an electric utility has incurred as the result of fraud, concealment, gross mismanagement, or lack of quality controls amounting to gross mismanagement, if commission approval is modified or canceled, the commission shall not disallow reasonable and prudent costs already incurred or committed to by contract by an electric utility. Once the commission finds that completion of the project or program is no longer reasonable and prudent, the commission may limit future cost recovery to those costs that could not be reasonably avoided. (18) The commission may allow financing interest cost recovery in an electric utility's base rates on construction work in progress for capital improvements approved under this section prior to the assets' being considered used and useful. Regardless of whether or not the commission authorizes base rate treatment for construction work in progress financing interest expense, an electric utility may recognize, accrue, and defer the allowance for funds used during construction. (19) An electric utility may seek to amend an approved integrated resource plan. Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, the commission shall consider the amendments under the same process and standards that govern the review and approval of a revised integrated resource plan under subsection (9). The commission may order an electric utility that seeks to amend an approved integrated resource plan under this subsection to file a plan review under subsection (21). (20) An electric utility shall file an application for review of its integrated resource plan not later than 5 years after the effective date of the most recent commission order approving a plan, a plan amendment, or a plan review. The commission shall consider a plan review under the same process and standards established in this section for review and approval of an integrated resource plan. A commission order approving a plan review has the same effect as an order approving an integrated resource plan. (21) The commission may, on its own motion or at the request of the electric utility, order an electric utility to file a plan review. The department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy may request the commission to order a plan review to address material changes in environmental regulations and requirements that occur after the commission's approval of an integrated resource plan. An electric utility must file a plan review within 270 days after the commission orders the utility to file a plan review. (22) As used in this section, "long-term firm gas transportation" means a binding agreement entered into between the electric utility and a natural gas transmission provider for a set period of time to provide firm delivery of natural gas to an electric generation facility. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 438 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.